Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.004

Intent—Use of word "board."

It is the intent of the legislature that the word "board" be read to mean both the school employees' benefits board and the public employees' benefits board throughout this chapter. The use of "board" should be liberally construed to mean both boards, to the extent not in conflict with state or federal law. In no case shall either board be limited from exercising its individual authority as authorized within this chapter.

[ 2018 c 260 s 5.]